Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 421.21 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
HB2606 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

A. Contingent upon the availability of funds, the District
Attorneys Council shall develop and implement a five-year Domestic
Violence Forensic Exam Pilot Program. The purpose of the Domestic
Violence Forensic Exam Pilot Program shall be to provide counties
with qualified licensed health care professionals who shall conduct
domestic violence forensic exams for victims of domestic violence
assault. Counties with a population of more than one hundred
thousand (100,000) according to the latest Federal Decennial Census
may participate in the pilot program. In conjunction with the
Domestic Violence Forensic Exam Pilot Program, a Domestic Violence
Examination Fund shall be established in each participating county
for the purpose of providing to a victim of domestic violence
assault, a forensic medical examination by a qualified licensed
health care professional.
B. As used in this section:
1. "Domestic violence" means any act of physical harm or the
threat of imminent physical harm which is committed by an adult,
emancipated minor, or minor child thirteen (13) years of age or
older against another adult, emancipated minor, or minor child who
is currently or was previously an intimate partner or family or
household member;
2. "Intimate partner" means:
a. current or former spouses,
b. persons who are in a dating relationship,
HB2606 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

c. persons who are the biological parents of the same
child, regardless of marital status or whether they
have lived together at any time, and
d. persons who currently or formerly lived together in an
intimate way, primarily characterized by affectionate
or sexual involvement. A sexual relationship may be
an indicator that a person is an intimate partner, but
is never a necessary condition;
3. "Living in the same household" means:
a. persons who regularly reside in the same single-
dwelling unit,
b. persons who resided in the same single-dwelling unit
within the past year, or
c. persons who have individual lease agreements whereby
each person has his or her own private bedroom and
shares common areas; and
4. "Qualified licensed health care professional" means a
physician, registered nurse, or other licensed health care
professional qualified by completion of a forty-hour didactic
domestic violence examiners course, as well as successful completion
of clinical competence.
C. The Crime Victims Compensation Board shall establish the
procedures for disbursement of the Domestic Violence Examination
Fund, but in no event shall the Crime Victims Compensation Board pay
HB2606 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

an a mount to exceed Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) for a domestic
violence forensic exam. Such payments shall not exceed the amounts
specified by this subsection regardless of the amount of any
individual bills comprising the claim. Payments shall be made only
upon claims signed by the victim or guardian and qualified licensed
health care professional.
D. The District Attorneys Council is hereby authorized to
transfer funds, as specified in the appropriations bill annually,
from the Crime Victims Compensation Fund to the Domestic Violence
Examination Fund for the payment of domestic violence forensic
exams, pursuant to this section.
E. The District Attorneys Council shall have the authority to
make any contract, execute any document, or perform any act in order
to carry out the Domestic Violence Forensic Exam Pilot Program.
F. Nothing in this section shall prevent the Legislature from
appropriating funds to the Domestic Violence Examination Fund for
the payment of domestic violence forensic examinations.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY AND PUBLIC SAFETY
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/06/2025 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.




HB2606 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.